District of Columbia statutes.
29-102.10

Delivery by Mayor.

Except as otherwise provided by § 29-106.02 or by law other than this title, the Mayor may deliver any record to a person by delivering it to the person that submitted it, to the address of the person’s registered agent, to the principal office address of the person, or to another address the person provides to the Mayor for delivery, or by delivering the record or notice by means of electronic transmission.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(a)(11), 59 DCR 13171
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 added “or by delivering the record or notice by means of electronic transmission delivery.”
This section is referenced in § 29-610.04.